Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1320
Arbitration board; decision; findings.

The arbitration board shall render its decision within thirty days after completion of the hearing. The decision shall be in writing, be accompanied by findings of fact, and be signed by the arbitrators supporting the decision. The findings of fact shall consist of a concise statement of the conclusions upon each contested issue of fact. The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be the decision of the arbitration board.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 20.